en: Mixed nut butters
de: Gemischte Nusspasten
fr: Purées de noix mélangées
hr: Miješani maslac od orašastih plodova
it: Cremas di noci miste
nl: Gemengde notenpasta's
pl: Pastas z orezechow mieszanych

en: Coconut butters, coconut purees, Coconut butter, coconut puree
bg: Кокосово масло
fr: Purées de noix de coco, Purée de noix de coco, Beurres de noix de coco, Beurre de noix de coco, Purées de coco, Purée de coco, Beurres de coco, Beurre de coco
hr: Kokosovi maslaci
ja: ココナッツバター
lt: Kokosų sviestai, kokosų tyrės
nl: Kokosboter, Kokosboters
pt: Manteigas de coco

en: Peanut butters, peanut paste, peanut creme
af: Grondboontjiebotter
ar: زبدة فول سوداني
bg: Фъстъчено масло
ca: Mantega de cacauet
cs: Burákové máslo
cy: Menyn cnau mwnci
da: Jordnøddesmør
de: Erdnussbutter
el: Φιστικοβούτυρο
eo: Arakida buteroj
es: Mantecas de cacahuete, Cremas de cacahuete, Crema de maní, Crema de cacaheute, Pasta de maní, Mantequilla de maní
et: Maapähklivõi
eu: Kakahuete-gurin
fa: کره بادام زمینی
fi: Maapähkinävoit
fr: Beurres de cacahuètes, beurres d’arachide, Purées de cacahuète, Purée de cacahuète, Purées d'arachide, Purée d'arachide, Pâtes à tartiner aux cacahuètes, beurre de cacahuète, pâte d'arachide, Beurre d'arachide
fy: Nútsjesmoar
ga: Im piseanna talún
gl: Manteiga de cacahuete
he: חמאות בוטנים
hr: Maslaci od kikirikija
hu: Mogyoróvaj
hy: Գետնանուշի կարագ
id: Selai kacang
is: Hnetusmjör
it: Burri di arachidi, Burro di arachidi
ja: ピーナッツバター, ピーナッツ・バター, ピーナツ・バター
jv: Selé kacang
kn: ಪೀನಟ್ ಬಟರ್
ko: 땅콩버터
la: Butyrum arachidum
ln: Mwǎmba-ngúba
lt: Žemės riešutų sviestai, Žemės riešutų pastos, Žemės riešutų sviestas
lv: Zemesriekstu sviests
mg: Menaka voanjo
mi: Pīnati pata
mk: Путер од кикиритки
ms: Mentega kacang
nb: Peanøttsmør
nl: Pindakazen, Pindakaas
nn: Peanøttsmør
pl: Masło z orzeszków ziemnych, Masło z orzeszków arachidowych, Masło orzechowe
pt: Manteigas de amendoim
ro: Unt de arahide
ru: Арахисовая паста, Арахисовые пасты
sk: Arašidové maslo
sl: Arašidovo maslo
sn: Dovi
sr: Путер од кикирикија
sv: Jordnötssmör
sw: Siagi ya karanga
th: เนยถั่วลิสง
tr: Yerfıstığı ezmesi, Fıstık ezmesi
uk: Арахісова паста
vi: Bơ đậu phộng
zh: 花生酱

en: Creamy peanut butters, Smooth peanut butters
da: Cremede jordnøddesmør, Creamy jordnøddesmør
pt: Manteigas de amendoim cremosas
sv: Jordnötssmör utan bitar, Creamy jordnötssmör

en: Crunchy peanut butters, Chunky peanut butters
da: Sprøde jordnøddesmør, Crunchy jordnøddesmør
fr: Beurres de cacahuetes croustillants
hr: Hrskavi maslaci od kikirikija
lt: Traškūs žemės riešutų sviestai
nl: Pindakazen met stukjes pinda
pt: Manteigas de amendoim crocantes
sv: Jordnötssmör med bitar, Crunchy jordnötssmör

en: Pure peanut butters
da: Rene jordnøddesmør
fr: Pur beurre de cacahuettes
hr: Čisti maslac od kikirikija
lt: Žemės riešutų sviestai (100%)
nl: Pindakazen (100% pinda)
pt: Manteigas de amendoim puras
sv: Rena jordnötssmör, 100% jordnötssmör

en: Creamy pure peanut butters, Pure creamy peanut butters
da: Cremede rene jordnøddesmør, Rene cremede jordnøddesmør
pt: Manteigas de amendoim puras e cremosas, Manteigas de amendoim cremosas puras
sv: Rena jordnötssmör utan bitar, 100% jordnötssmör utan bitar

en: Crunchy pure peanut butters, Pure crunchy peanut butters
da: Sprøde rene jordnøddesmør, Rene sprøde jordnøddesmør
pt: Manteigas de amendoim puras e crocantes, Manteigas de amendoim crocantes puras
sv: Rena jordnötssmör med bitar, 100% jordnötssmör med bitar

en: Flavoured peanut butters
nl: Gearomatiseerde pindkazen, Pindakazen (gearomatiseerd)

en: Pistachio butters
es: Mantecas de pistachos
fr: Beurres de pistaches, Purées de pistaches
hr: Maslaci od pistacija
it: Burri di pistacchio
ja: ピスタチオバター
lt: Pistacijų sviestai
nl: Pistachenotenpasta's, Pistachepastas
pt: Manteigas de pistácios

en: Walnut butters
es: Mantecas de nueces
fr: Beurres de noix
hr: Maslaci od oraha
ja: クルミバター, くるみバター
lt: Graikinių riešutų sviestai
nl: Walnotenpasta's
pt: Manteigas de noz

en: Refrigerated chestnut mousse
fr: Mousse à la crème de marrons rayon frais

en: Canned nuts
de: Nüsse in Dosen
es: Frutos de cáscara en conserva, Conservas de frutos de cáscara, Frutos secos en conserva
fr: Fruits à coques en conserve
hr: Konzervirani orasi
nl: Noten in blik/pot

en: Nut confectioneries
de: Nusskonfekt, Nuss Konfekt
es: Dulces de frutos de cáscara, Dulces de frutos secos
fi: sokerileipomotuotteet pähkinöistä
fr: Confiseries de fruits à coques
hr: Slastice s orašastim plodovima
it: Dolci alla noce
lt: Riešutų saldainiai
nl: Notensnoep

en: Caramelized sesame seeds
nl: Gekarameliseerde sesam

en: Marrons glacés, Marrón glacé, Candied chesnuts, Iced chestnuts
xx: Marrons glacés
es: Castañas confitadas, Castañas glaseadas, Marrón glacé, Marrons glacés
fr: Marrons glacés, Marrón glacé
hr: Marrons glacés
it: Marrons glacés
nl: Suikerkastanjes

en: Caramelized nuts
de: Karamellisierte Nüsse
fr: Fruits à coques caramélisées
nl: Suikernoten, Gekarameliseerde noten

en: Caramelized pine nuts, Sugar coated pinenuts
es: Piñones cubiertos de azúcar
fr: Pignons de pin enrobés de sucre
hr: Pinjole obložene šećerom
nl: Suikerpijnboompitten

en: Caramelized almonds, Sugar coated almonds
de: Mandeln mit Zuckerüberzug
es: Peladillas, Almendras caramelizadas
fr: Amandes caramélisées, Amandes enrobées de sucre
hr: Bademi obloženi šećerom, Karamelizirani bademi
hu: Cukorral bevont mandula
lt: Cukruoti migdolai, cukrumi padengti migdolai, Karamelizuoti migdolai
nl: Suikeramandelen, Gecarameliseerde amandelen
pt: Amêndoas caramelizadas

en: Caramelized hazelnuts, Caramelised hazelnuts
de: Karamellisierte Haselnüsse
es: Avellanas garrapiñadas, Avellanas caramelizadas
fr: Noisettes caramélisées
hr: Karameliziranih lješnjaka
lt: Karamelizuoti lazdyno riešutai
nl: Suikerhazelnoten, Gekarameliseerde hazelnoten